Utah statutes.
7-1-305.   Final decisions on applications for new institutions, branches,
relocation, merger, consolidation, acquisition and changes in control of
financial institutions.
The commissioner shall make final decisions consistent with the purposes and
provisions of this title on behalf of the department upon all applications to
the department for approval of new institutions, branches, relocation, mergers
or consolidation, acquisitions and changes in control of institutions subject
to the jurisdiction of the department.
